Illinois, session 104th, SB1310.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Western Illinois University Law is amended 5by changing Section 35-45 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 690/35-45)7    Sec. 35-45. Powers and duties. The Board also shall have 8power and it shall be its duty:9    (1) To make rules, regulations and bylaws, not 10inconsistent with law, for the government and management of 11Western Illinois University and its branches;12    (2) To employ, and, for good cause, to remove a President 13of Western Illinois University, and all necessary deans, 14professors, associate professors, assistant professors, 15instructors, other educational and administrative assistants, 16and all other necessary employees, and to prescribe their 17duties and contract with them upon matters relating to tenure, 18salaries and retirement benefits in accordance with the State 19Universities Civil Service Act. Whenever the Board establishes 20a search committee to fill the position of President of 21Western Illinois University, there shall be minority 22representation, including women, on that search committee. The 23Board shall, upon the written request of an employee of   SB1310 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1Western Illinois University, withhold from the compensation of 2that employee any dues, payments or contributions payable by 3such employee to any labor organization as defined in the 4Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act. Under such 5arrangement, an amount shall be withheld from each regular 6payroll period which is equal to the pro rata share of the 7annual dues plus any payments or contributions, and the Board 8shall transmit such withholdings to the specified labor 9organization within 10 working days from the time of the 10withholding;11    (3) To prescribe the courses of study to be followed, and 12textbooks and apparatus to be used at Western Illinois 13University;14    (4) To issue upon the recommendation of the faculty, 15diplomas to such persons as have satisfactorily completed the 16required studies of Western Illinois University, and confer 17such professional and literary degrees as are usually 18conferred by other institutions of like character for similar 19or equivalent courses of study, or such as the Board may deem 20appropriate;21    (5) To examine into the conditions, management, and 22administration of Western Illinois University, to provide the 23requisite buildings, apparatus, equipment and auxiliary 24enterprises, and to fix and collect matriculation fees; 25tuition fees; fees for student activities; fees for student 26facilities such as student union buildings or field houses or   SB1310 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1stadia or other recreational facilities; student welfare fees; 2laboratory fees; and similar fees for supplies and materials. 3The expense of the building, improving, repairing and 4supplying fuel and furniture and the necessary appliances and 5apparatus for conducting Western Illinois University, the 6reimbursed expenses of members of the Board, and the salaries 7or compensation of the President, assistants, agents and other 8employees of Western Illinois University, shall be a charge 9upon the State Treasury. All other expenses shall be 10chargeable against students, and the Board shall regulate the 11charges accordingly;12    (6) To succeed to and to administer all trusts, trust 13property, and gifts now or hereafter belonging or pertaining 14to Western Illinois University;15    (7) To accept endowments of professorships or departments 16in Western Illinois University from any person who may proffer 17them and, at regular meetings, to prescribe rules and 18regulations in relation to endowments and declare on what 19general principles they may be accepted;20    (8) To enter into contracts with the Federal government 21for providing courses of instruction and other services at 22Western Illinois University for persons serving in or with the 23military or naval forces of the United States, and to provide 24such courses of instruction and other services;25    (9) To contract with respect to the Cooperative Computer 26Center to obtain services related to electronic data   SB1310 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1processing;2    (10) To provide for the receipt and expenditures of 3Federal funds paid to Western Illinois University by the 4Federal government for instruction and other services for 5persons serving in or with the military or naval forces of the 6United States, and to provide for audits of such funds;7    (11) To appoint, subject to the applicable civil service 8law, persons to be members of the Western Illinois University 9Police Department. Members of the Police Department shall be 10conservators of the peace and as such have all powers 11possessed by policemen in cities, and sheriffs, including the 12power to make arrests on view or warrants of violations of 13State statutes, University rules and regulations and city or 14county ordinances, except that they may exercise such powers 15only within counties wherein Western Illinois University and 16any of its branches or properties are located when such is 17required for the protection of University properties and 18interests, and its students and personnel, and otherwise, 19within such counties, when requested by appropriate State or 20local law enforcement officials. However, such officers shall 21have no power to serve and execute civil processes.22    The Board must authorize to each member of the Western 23Illinois University Police Department and to any other 24employee of Western Illinois University exercising the powers 25of a peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) 26clearly states that the badge is authorized by Western   SB1310 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1Illinois University and (ii) contains a unique identifying 2number. No other badge shall be authorized by Western Illinois 3University;4    (12) The Board may, directly or in cooperation with other 5institutions of higher education, acquire by purchase or lease 6or otherwise, and construct, enlarge, improve, equip, 7complete, operate, control and manage research and high 8technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 9buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 10therefor, to encourage and facilitate (i) the location and 11development of business and industry in the State of Illinois, 12and (ii) the increased application and development of 13technology, and (iii) the improvement and development of the 14State's economy. The Board may lease to nonprofit corporations 15all or any part of the land, buildings, facilities, equipment 16or other property included in a research and high technology 17park upon such terms and conditions as the Board may deem 18advisable and enter into any contract or agreement with such 19nonprofit corporations as may be necessary or suitable for the 20construction, financing, operation and maintenance and 21management of any such park; and may lease to any person, firm, 22partnership or corporation, either public or private, any part 23or all of the land, building, facilities, equipment or other 24property of such park for such purposes and upon such rentals, 25terms and conditions as the Board may deem advisable; and may 26finance all or part of the cost of any such park, including the   SB1310 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1purchase, lease, construction, reconstruction, improvement, 2remodeling, addition to, and extension and maintenance of all 3or part of such high technology park, and all equipment and 4furnishings, by legislative appropriations, government grants, 5contracts, private gifts, loans, receipts from the operation 6of such high technology park, rentals and similar receipts; 7and may make its other facilities and services available to 8tenants or other occupants of any such park at rates which are 9reasonable and appropriate;10    (13) To borrow money, as necessary, from time to time in 11anticipation of receiving tuition, payments from the State of 12Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University, 13also known as anticipated moneys. The borrowing limit shall be 14capped at 100% of the total amount of payroll and other expense 15vouchers submitted and payable to the University for fiscal 16year 2010 expenses, but unpaid by the State Comptroller's 17office. Prior to borrowing any funds, the University shall 18request from the Comptroller's office a verification of the 19borrowing limit and shall include the estimated date on which 20such borrowing shall occur. The borrowing limit cap shall be 21verified by the State Comptroller's office not prior to 45 22days before any estimated date for executing any promissory 23note or line of credit established under this item (13). The 24principal amount borrowed under a promissory note or line of 25credit shall not exceed 75% of the borrowing limit. Within 15 26days after borrowing funds under any promissory note or line   SB1310 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1of credit established under this item (13), the University 2shall submit to the Governor's Office of Management and 3Budget, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 4Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the President 5of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate an 6Emergency Short Term Cash Management Plan. The Emergency Short 7Term Cash Management Plan shall outline the amount borrowed, 8the terms for repayment, the amount of outstanding State 9vouchers as verified by the State Comptroller's office, and 10the University's plan for expenditure of any borrowed funds, 11including, but not limited to, a detailed plan to meet payroll 12obligations to include collective bargaining employees, civil 13service employees, and academic, research, and health care 14personnel. The establishment of any promissory note or line of 15credit established under this item (13) must be finalized 16within 90 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 17of the 96th General Assembly. The borrowed moneys shall be 18applied to the purposes of paying salaries and other expenses 19lawfully authorized in the University's State appropriation 20and unpaid by the State Comptroller. Any line of credit 21established under this item (13) shall be paid in full one year 22after creation or within 10 days after the date the University 23receives reimbursement from the State for all submitted fiscal 24year 2010 vouchers, whichever is earlier. Any promissory note 25established under this item (13) shall be repaid within one 26year after issuance of the note. The Chairman, Comptroller, or   SB1310 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1Treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 2similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 3by the borrowing. In connection with a borrowing, the Board 4may establish a line of credit with a financial institution, 5investment bank, or broker/dealer. The obligation to make the 6payments due under any promissory note or line of credit 7established under this item (13) shall be a lawful obligation 8of the University payable from the anticipated moneys. Any 9borrowing under this item (13) shall not constitute a debt, 10legal or moral, of the State and shall not be enforceable 11against the State. The promissory note or line of credit shall 12be authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 13valid whether or not a budgeted item with respect to that 14resolution is included in any annual or supplemental budget 15adopted by the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts 16demonstrating the need for the borrowing, state an amount that 17the amount to be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a 18maximum interest rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate 19authorized by the Bond Authorization Act or 9%, whichever is 20less. The resolution may direct the Comptroller or Treasurer 21of the Board to make arrangements to set apart and hold the 22portion of the anticipated moneys, as received, that shall be 23used to repay the borrowing, subject to any prior pledges or 24restrictions with respect to the anticipated moneys. The 25resolution may also authorize the Treasurer of the Board to 26make partial repayments of the borrowing as the anticipated   SB1310 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1moneys become available and may contain any other terms, 2restrictions, or limitations not inconsistent with the powers 3of the Board.4    For the purposes of this item (13), "financial 5institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 6Act, any savings and loan association subject to the Illinois 7Savings and Loan Act of 1985, and any federally chartered 8commercial bank or savings and loan association or 9government-sponsored enterprise organized and operated in this 10State pursuant to the laws of the United States.11    (14) To assist in the provision of lands, buildings, and 12facilities that are supportive of University purposes and 13suitable and appropriate for the conduct and operation of the 14University's education programs, the Board may exercise the 15following powers with regard to that part of the Southeast 16Quarter of Section 11, Township 17 North, Range 1 West of the 174th Principal Meridian, the boundary which is described as 18follows:19    From the Northeast corner of Lot 33 of Homewood Terrace 20    Second Addition to the City of Moline in Rock Island 21    County, Illinois, said corner being the point of beginning 22    and being 1272.48 feet South and 526.23 feet East of the 23    center of Section 11; proceed thence South 00 deg.-00'-00" 24    West 179.04 feet along the East line of said Homewood 25    Terrace Second Addition; thence South 34 deg.-30'-00" West 26    l35.00 feet along the East line of said Homewood Terrace   SB1310 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1    Second Addition; thence South 34 deg.-22'-33" East 353.34 2    feet to the East line of the First Section of Homewood 5th 3    Addition to the City of Moline in Rock Island County, 4    Illinois; thence South 21 deg.-14'-01" East 448.00 feet 5    along the East line of said First Section of Homewood 5th 6    Addition to the North Right-of-Way line of Coaltown Road, 7    Moline; thence North 69 deg.-30'-59" East 13.39 feet along 8    the North Right-of-Way of Coaltown Road; thence 9    Northeasterly 302.69 feet along the North Right-of-Way of 10    Coaltown Road around a circular curve to the Right, said 11    curve having an initial tangent bearing of North 69 12    deg.-30'-59" East and a radius of 1950.08 feet; thence 13    North 49 deg.-29'-56" East 99.18 feet along the North 14    Right-of-Way line of Coaltown Road, Moline, to the West 15    Right-of-Way line of 60th Street, Moline; thence North 09 16    deg.-29'-20" West 366.24 feet along the West Right-of-Way 17    line of 60th Street, Moline Right-of-Way monument; thence 18    North 10 deg.-10'-03" West 263.50 feet along the West 19    Right-of-Way line of 60th Street, Moline Right-of-Way 20    monument; thence North 01 deg.-45'-57" West 81.37 feet 21    along the West line of 60th Street, Moline; thence 22    Northwesterly 581.39 feet around a circular curve to the 23    right, said curve having an initial tangent bearing of 24    South 89 deg.-27'-55" West and a radius of 1085.00 feet to 25    the point of beginning; Situated in Rock Island County, 26    Illinois.   SB1310 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1        (A) The Board may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer 2    and convey all or part of the real estate described in this 3    item (14), together with the improvements situated 4    thereon, to a bona fide purchaser for value, without 5    compliance with the State Property Control Act and on such 6    terms as the Board shall determine are in the best 7    interests of the University and consistent with its 8    objects and purposes. 9        (B) The Board may retain the proceeds from the sale, 10    lease, or other transfer of all or any part of the real 11    estate described in this item (14) in the University 12    treasury, in a special, separate development fund account 13    that the Auditor General shall examine to ensure the use 14    or deposit of those proceeds in a manner consistent with 15    subdivision (C) of this item (14). 16        (C) Revenues from the development fund account may be 17    withdrawn by the University for the purpose of demolition 18    and the processes associated with demolition; routine land 19    and property acquisition; streetscape work; landscape 20    work; lease and lease purchase arrangements and the 21    professional services associated with planning and 22    development; surface and structure parking; sidewalks, 23    recreational paths, and street construction; utility 24    infrastructure; historic preservation; and building 25    rehabilitation. Money from the development fund account 26    used for any other purpose must be deposited into and   SB1310 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1    appropriated from the General Revenue Fund. Buildings or 2    facilities leased to an entity or person other than the 3    University are not subject to any limitations applicable 4    to a State-supported college or university under any law. 5    All development on the land and all use of any buildings or 6    facilities is subject to the control and approval of the 7    Board. 8    (15) For purposes of this item (15), "financial 9institution" means any bank subject to the Illinois Banking 10Act, any savings and loan association or savings bank subject 11to the Savings Bank Act, any credit union subject to the 12Illinois Credit Union Act, and any federally chartered 13commercial bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, 14or credit union organized and operated in this State pursuant 15to the laws of the United States.16    To borrow money for any lawful purpose from the WIU 17Foundation or any financial institution, as long as such money 18is repaid within 5 years from the time the money is borrowed. 19The amount outstanding from time to time under this item (15) 20may not exceed $2,000,000. The chairman, comptroller, or 21treasurer of the Board shall execute a promissory note or 22similar debt instrument to evidence the indebtedness incurred 23by the borrowing. The obligation to make the payments due 24under any promissory note or line of credit established under 25this item (15) shall be a lawful obligation of the University 26payable from available tuition, payments from the State of   SB1310 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07337 LNS 17377 b1Illinois, or other revenues or receipts of the University. Any 2borrowing under this item (15) does not constitute a debt, 3legal or moral, of the State and is not enforceable against the 4State. The promissory note or line of credit shall be 5authorized by a resolution passed by the Board and shall be 6valid whether a budgeted item with respect to that resolution 7is included in any annual or supplemental budget adopted by 8the Board. The resolution shall set forth facts demonstrating 9the need for the borrowing, state an amount that the amount to 10be borrowed will not exceed, and establish a maximum interest 11rate limit not to exceed the maximum rate authorized by the 12Bond Authorization Act.13     14(Source: P.A. 97-333, eff. 8-12-11; 98-998, eff. 8-18-14.)